California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(b) An earnings assignment order for support shall be given priority over any earnings withholding order. An employer upon whom an earnings assignment order for support is served shall withhold and pay over the earnings of the employee pursuant to the assignment order notwithstanding the requirements of any earnings withholding order. When an employer is required to cease withholding earnings
 pursuant to an earnings withholding order, the employer shall notify the levying officer who served the earnings withholding order that a supervening earnings assignment order for support is in effect.

(c) Subject to subdivisions (b), (d), and (e), an employer shall withhold earnings of an employee pursuant to both an earnings assignment order for support and an earnings withholding order.

(d) The employer shall withhold pursuant to an earnings withholding order only to the extent that the sum of the amount withheld pursuant to any earnings assignment order for support and the amount withheld pursuant to the earnings withholding order does not exceed the amount that may be withheld under Article 3 (commencing with Section 706.050).

(e) The employer shall withhold pursuant to an earnings withholding order for taxes
 only to the extent that the sum of the amount withheld pursuant to any earnings assignment order for support and the amount withheld pursuant to the earnings withholding order for taxes does not exceed the amount that may be withheld under Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

706.032.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by statute:

(1) If withholding under an earnings withholding order ceases because the judgment debtor’s employment has terminated, the earnings withholding order terminates at the conclusion of a continuous 180-day period during which no amounts are withheld under the order.

(2) If withholding under an earnings withholding order ceases because the judgment debtor’s earnings
 are subject to an order or assignment with higher priority, the earnings withholding order terminates at the conclusion of a continuous two-year period during which no amounts are withheld under the order.

(b) If an earnings withholding order has terminated pursuant to subdivision (a), the employer shall return the order to the levying officer along with a statement of the reasons for returning the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 283, Sec. 11.   Effective July 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

706.033.

If the writ is returned before the earnings withholding order terminates, on termination of the earnings withholding order the levying officer shall make a supplemental return on the writ. The supplemental return shall contain the same information as an original return pursuant to Section 699.560.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 283, Sec. 12.   Effective July 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

706.034.

The employer may deduct from the earnings of the employee the sum of one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) for each payment made in accordance with an earnings withholding order issued pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 520, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Restrictions on Earnings Withholding [706.050. - 706.052.]

706.050.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the maximum amount of disposable earnings of an individual judgment debtor for any workweek that is subject to levy under an earnings withholding order shall not exceed the lesser of the following:

(1) Twenty percent of the individual’s disposable earnings for that week.

(2) Forty percent of the amount by which the individual’s disposable earnings for that week exceed 48 times the state minimum hourly wage in effect at the time the earnings are payable. If a judgment debtor works in a location where the local minimum hourly wage is greater than the state minimum hourly wage, the local minimum hourly wage in effect at the time the earnings are payable shall be used for the calculation made
 pursuant to this paragraph. 

(b) For any pay period other than weekly, the following multipliers shall be used to determine the maximum amount of disposable earnings subject to levy under an earnings withholding order that is proportional in effect to the calculation described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), except as specified in paragraph (1):

(1) For a daily pay period, the amounts shall be identical to the amounts described in subdivision (a).

(2) For a biweekly pay period, multiply the applicable hourly minimum wage by 96
 work hours.

(3) For a semimonthly pay period, multiply the applicable hourly minimum wage by 104 work hours.

(4) For a monthly pay period, multiply the applicable hourly minimum wage by
 208 work hours.

(c) This section shall become operative on September 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 849, Sec. 2.   (SB 1477)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative September 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

706.051.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “family of the judgment debtor” includes the spouse or former spouse of the judgment debtor.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the portion of the judgment debtor’s earnings that the judgment debtor proves is necessary for the support of the judgment debtor or the judgment debtor’s family
 supported in whole or in part by the judgment debtor is exempt from levy under this chapter.

(c) The exemption provided in subdivision (b) is not available if any of the following exceptions applies:

(1) The debt was incurred pursuant to an order or award for the payment of attorney’s fees under Section 2030, 3121, or 3557 of the Family Code.

(2) The debt was incurred for personal services rendered by an employee or former employee of the judgment debtor.

(3) The order is a withholding order for support under Section 706.030.

(4) The order is one governed by Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) (state tax order).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 694, Sec. 1.   (AB 1388)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

706.052.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), one-half of the disposable earnings (as defined by Section 1672 of Title 15 of the United States Code) of the judgment debtor, plus any amount withheld from the judgment debtor’s earnings pursuant to any earnings assignment order for support, is exempt from levy under this chapter where the earnings withholding order is a withholding order for support under Section 706.030.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), upon
 motion of any interested party, the court shall make an equitable division of the judgment debtor’s earnings that takes into account the needs of all the persons the judgment debtor is required to support and shall effectuate such division by an order determining the amount to be withheld from the judgment debtor’s earnings pursuant to the withholding order for support.

(c) An order made under subdivision (b) may not authorize the withholding of an amount in excess of the amount that may be withheld for support under federal law under Section 1673 of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Earnings Withholding Order for Taxes [706.070. - 706.084.]

706.070.

As used in this article:

(a) “State” means the State of California and includes any officer, department, board, or agency thereof.

(b) “State tax liability” means an amount for which the state has a state tax lien as defined in Section 7162 of the Government Code excluding a state tax lien
 created pursuant to the Fish and Game Code.

(c) For purposes of an earnings withholding order for taxes issued by the Franchise Tax Board, “state tax liability” also includes any liability under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code that is due and payable within the meaning of subdivision (b) of Section 19221 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and unpaid. The amendments to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to any amount that is unpaid on or after the effective date of that act, or any amount that first becomes due and payable, and unpaid, after the effective date of that act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 37, Sec. 1.   (SB 1015)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

706.071.

This chapter does not limit the state’s right to collect a state tax liability except that (a) no levy upon earnings of an employee held by an employer is effective unless such levy is made in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and (b) other methods of collection may not be used to require an employer to withhold earnings of an employee in payment of a state tax liability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

706.072.

(a) A “withholding order for taxes” is an earnings withholding order issued pursuant to this article to collect a state tax liability and shall be denoted as a withholding order for taxes on its face.

(b) A withholding order for taxes may only be issued under one of the following circumstances:

(1) The existence of the state tax liability appears on the face of the taxpayer’s return, including a case where such tax liability is disclosed from the taxpayer’s return after errors in mathematical
 computations in the return have been corrected.

(2) The state tax liability has been assessed or determined as provided by statute and the taxpayer had notice of the proposed assessment or determination and had available an opportunity to have the proposed assessment or determination reviewed by appropriate administrative procedures. If the taxpayer makes a timely request for review of the assessment or determination, the state shall not issue a withholding order for taxes until the administrative review procedure is completed. If the taxpayer is given notice of the proposed assessment or determination but does not make a timely request for review, the state may issue a withholding order for taxes.

(c) In any case where a state tax liability has been assessed or determined prior to July 1, 1983, and the state determines that the requirement of subdivision (b) may not have been
 satisfied, the state may send a “Notice of Proposed Issuance of Withholding Order for Taxes” to the taxpayer at the taxpayer’s last known address by first-class mail, postage prepaid. The notice shall advise the taxpayer that the taxpayer may have the assessment or determination reviewed by appropriate administrative procedures and state how such a review may be obtained. If the taxpayer is sent such a notice and requests such a review within 30 days from the date the notice was mailed to the taxpayer, the state shall provide appropriate administrative procedures for review of the assessment or determination and shall not issue the withholding order for taxes until the administrative review procedure is completed. If the taxpayer is sent such a notice and does not request such a review within 30 days from the date the notice was mailed to the taxpayer, the state may issue the withholding order for taxes.

(d) A withholding order for taxes may be
 issued whether or not the state tax liability has been reduced to judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

706.073.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the provisions of this chapter govern the procedures and proceedings concerning a withholding order for taxes. For the purposes of this article, a reference in this chapter to a “levying officer” shall be deemed to mean the specific state agency seeking to collect a state tax liability under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

706.074.

(a) The state may itself issue a withholding order for taxes under this section to collect a state tax liability. The order shall specify the total amount required to be withheld pursuant to the order (unpaid tax liability including any penalties, accrued interest, and costs).

(b) Unless a lesser amount is specified in the order, the amount to be withheld by the employer each pay period pursuant to an order issued under this section is the amount required to be withheld under Section 1673(a) of Title 15 of the United States Code, and is not subject to the
 exception provided in Section 1673(b) of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

706.075.

(a) This section applies to any withholding order for taxes issued under this article.

(b) Together with the withholding order for taxes, the state shall serve upon the employer an additional copy of the order and a notice informing the taxpayer of the effect of the order and of his right to hearings and remedies provided in this chapter. Within 10 days from the date of service, the employer shall deliver to the taxpayer a copy of the order and the notice, except that immediate delivery shall be made where a jeopardy withholding order for taxes has been served. If
 the taxpayer is no longer employed by the employer and the employer does not owe the taxpayer any earnings, the employer is not required to make such delivery.

(c) The state shall provide for an administrative hearing to reconsider or modify the amount to be withheld pursuant to the withholding order for taxes, and the taxpayer may request such a hearing at any time after service of the order. If the taxpayer requests a hearing, the hearing shall be provided, and the matter shall be determined, within 15 days after the request is received by the state. The determination of the amount to be withheld is subject to the standard provided in subdivision (b) of Section 706.051. Judicial review of the determination made pursuant to this subdivision by the state may be had only if a petition for a writ of mandate pursuant to Section 1094.5 is filed within 90 days from the date that written notice of the state’s determination was delivered or mailed to
 the taxpayer.

(d) The employer is not subject to any civil liability for failure to comply with subdivision (b). Nothing in this subdivision limits the power of a court to hold the employer in contempt of court for failure to comply with subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

706.076.

(a) A withholding order for taxes may be issued pursuant to this section requiring the employer of the taxpayer to withhold an amount in excess of the amount that may be required to be withheld pursuant to an order issued under Section 706.074.

(b) The state may, at any time, apply to a court of record in the county where the taxpayer was last known to reside for the issuance of a withholding order for taxes under this section to collect a state tax liability.

(c) The application for the order shall
 include a statement under oath that the state has served upon the taxpayer both of the following:

(1) A copy of the application.

(2) A notice informing the taxpayer of the purpose of the application and the right of the taxpayer to appear at the court hearing on the application.

(d) Upon the filing of the application, the court shall immediately set the matter for hearing and the court clerk shall send a notice of the time and place of the hearing by first-class mail, postage prepaid, to the state and the taxpayer. The notice shall be deposited in the mail at least 10 days before the day set for the hearing.

(e) After hearing, the court shall issue a withholding order for taxes which shall require the taxpayer’s employer to withhold and pay over all
 earnings of the taxpayer other than that amount which the taxpayer proves is exempt under subdivision (b) of Section 706.051, but in no event shall the amount to be withheld be less than that permitted to be withheld under Section 706.050.

(f) The state may issue a temporary earnings holding order, which shall be denoted as such on its face, in any case where the state intends to apply for a withholding order for taxes under this section and has determined that the collection of the state tax liability will be jeopardized in whole or in part if the temporary earnings holding order is not issued. The temporary earnings holding order shall be directed to the taxpayer’s employer and shall require the employer to retain in the employer’s possession or under the employer’s control all or such portion of the earnings of the taxpayer then or thereafter due as is specified in the order. Together with the temporary earnings holding order, the state
 shall serve upon the employer an additional copy of the order and a notice informing the taxpayer of the effect of the order and of the right to the remedies provided in this chapter. Upon receipt of the order, the employer shall deliver to the taxpayer a copy of the order and notice. If the taxpayer is no longer employed by the employer and the employer does not owe the taxpayer any earnings, the employer is not required to make such delivery. The temporary earnings holding order expires 15 days from the date it is served on the employer unless it is extended by the court on ex parte application for good cause shown. If a temporary earnings holding order is served on an employer, the state may not thereafter, for a period of six months, serve on the same employer another temporary earnings holding order for the same employee unless the court for good cause shown otherwise orders. Sections 706.153 and 706.154 apply to temporary earnings holding orders issued under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

706.077.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), an employer upon whom a withholding order for taxes is served shall withhold and pay over earnings of the employee pursuant to such order and shall cease to withhold earnings pursuant to any prior earnings withholding order except that a withholding order for support shall be given priority as provided in Section 706.030. When an employer is required to cease withholding earnings pursuant to an earlier earnings withholding order, the employer shall notify the levying officer who served the earlier earnings withholding order that a supervening withholding order for taxes is in effect.

(b) An employer shall not withhold earnings of an employee pursuant to a withholding order for taxes if a prior withholding order for taxes is in effect, and, in such case, the subsequent withholding order for taxes is ineffective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

706.078.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the employer shall not withhold pursuant to a withholding order for taxes from earnings of the employee payable for any pay period of such employee that ends prior to the 10th day after service of the order.

(b) A “jeopardy withholding order for taxes,” which shall be denoted as such on its face, is a withholding order for taxes that requires that the employer withhold pursuant to the order from earnings due to the employee at the time of service of the order on the employer and from earnings thereafter due. A jeopardy
 withholding order for taxes may be issued only where the state has determined that the collection of a state tax liability will be jeopardized in whole or in part by delaying the time when withholding from earnings commences.

(c) An employer shall continue to withhold pursuant to a withholding order for taxes until the amount specified in the order has been paid in full or the order is withdrawn, except that the order automatically terminates one year after the employment of the employee by the employer terminates. The state shall promptly serve on the employer a notice terminating the withholding order for taxes if the state tax liability for which the withholding order for taxes was issued is satisfied before the employer has withheld the full amount specified in the order, and the employer shall discontinue withholding in compliance with such notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

706.080.

Service of a withholding order for taxes or of any other notice or document required under this chapter in connection with a withholding order for taxes may be made by the state by first-class mail, postage prepaid, or by any authorized state employee. Service of a withholding order for taxes is complete when it is received by the employer or a person described in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 706.101. Service of, or the providing of, any other notice or document required to be served or provided under this chapter in connection with a withholding order for taxes is complete when the notice or document is deposited in the mail
 addressed to the last known address of the person on whom it is served or to whom it is to be provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

706.081.

Except for the forms referred to in Section 706.076, the state shall prescribe the form of any order, notice, or other document required by this chapter in connection with a withholding order for taxes notwithstanding Sections 706.100 and 706.120, and any form so prescribed is deemed to comply with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

706.082.

No review of the taxpayer’s tax liability shall be permitted in any court proceedings under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

706.084.

Where a warrant, notice of levy, or notice or order to withhold is served on the employer to enforce a state tax liability of a person who is an employee of that employer, it shall be deemed to be a withholding order for taxes as to any earnings that are subject to the provisions of this chapter if both of the following requirements are satisfied:

(a) The form provides notice on its face that it is to be treated as a withholding order for taxes as to any earnings that are subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(b) The
 form provides all the information provided in a withholding order for taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Procedure for Earnings Withholding Orders and Exemption Claims [706.100. - 706.109.]

706.100.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Judicial Council may provide by rule for the practice and procedure in proceedings under this chapter except for the state’s administrative hearings provided by Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

706.101.

(a) An earnings withholding order shall be served by the levying officer upon the employer by delivery of the order to any of the following:

(1) The managing agent or person in charge, at the time of service, of the branch or office where the employee works or the office from which the employee is paid. In the case of a state
 employee, the office from which the employee is paid does not include the Controller’s office unless the employee works directly for the Controller’s office.

(2) Any person to whom a copy of the summons and of the complaint may be delivered to make service on the employer under Article 4 (commencing with Section 416.10) of Chapter 4 of Title 5.

(b) Service of an earnings withholding order shall be made by personal delivery as provided in Section 415.10 or 415.20 or by delivery by first-class mail, postage prepaid. When service is made by first-class mail, service is complete at the time of receipt of the earnings withholding order, as indicated in the employer’s return, or the date of mailing if the date of receipt is not indicated on the employer’s return. If the levying officer attempts service by first-class mail under this subdivision and does not receive the employer’s return
 within 15 days from the date of mailing, the levying officer shall make service as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 415.10) of Chapter 4 of Title 5. For purposes of this section, “employer’s return” refers to the Judicial Council-issued form specified by Section 706.126.

(c) The state may issue an earnings withholding order directly, without the use of a levying officer, for purposes of collecting overpayments of unemployment compensation or disability benefits pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 1375) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of, and Article 5 (commencing with Section 2735) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of, Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code. The earnings withholding order shall be served by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, with return receipt requested. Service is deemed complete at the time the return receipt is executed by, or on behalf of, the recipient. If the state does not receive a return
 receipt within 15 days from the date of deposit in the mail of the withholding order, the state shall refer the earnings withholding order to a levying officer for service in accordance with subdivision (b).

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (b) or (c), service of any notice or document under this chapter may be made by first-class mail, postage prepaid. If service is made on the employer after the employer’s return has been received by the levying officer, the service shall be made by first-class mail, postage prepaid, on the person designated in the employer’s return to receive notices and at the address indicated in the employer’s return, whether or not that address is within the county. This subdivision does not preclude service by personal delivery (1) on the employer before the employer’s return has been received by the levying officer or (2) on the person designated in the employer’s return after its receipt.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), if the judgment creditor so requests, the levying officer shall make service of the earnings withholding order by personal delivery as provided in Section 415.10 or 415.20.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 680, Sec. 13.   (AB 2394)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

706.102.

(a) If a writ of execution has been issued to the county where the judgment debtor’s employer is to be served and the time specified in subdivision (b) of Section 699.530 for levy on property under the writ has not expired, a judgment creditor may apply for the issuance of an earnings withholding order by filing an application with a levying officer in such county who shall promptly issue an earnings withholding order.

(b) This section does not apply where the earnings withholding order is a withholding order for taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

706.103.

(a) The levying officer shall serve upon the designated employer all of the following:

(1) The original and one copy of the earnings withholding order.

(2) The form for the employer’s return.

(3) The notice to the employee of the earnings withholding order.

(4) A copy of the form that the judgment debtor may use to make a claim of exemption.

(5) A copy of the form the judgment debtor may use to provide a financial statement.

(b) At the time the levying officer makes service pursuant to subdivision (a), the levying officer shall provide the employer with a copy of the employer’s instructions referred to in Section 706.127. The Judicial Council may adopt rules prescribing the circumstances when compliance with this subdivision is not required.

(c) No earnings withholding order shall be served upon the employer after the time specified in subdivision (b) of Section 699.530.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 514, Sec. 11.   (AB 2837)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

706.104.

Any employer who is served with an earnings withholding order shall:

(a) Deliver to the judgment debtor a copy of the earnings withholding order, the notice to employee of earnings withholding, a copy of the form that the judgment debtor may use to make a claim of exemption, and a copy of the form the judgment debtor may use to provide a financial
 statement within 10 days from the date of service. If the judgment debtor is no longer employed by the employer and the employer does not owe the employee any earnings, the employer is not required to make such delivery. The employer is not subject to any civil liability for failure to comply with this subdivision. Nothing in this subdivision limits the power of a court to hold the employer in contempt of court for failure to comply with this subdivision.

(b) Complete the employer’s return on the form provided by the levying officer and mail it by first-class mail, postage prepaid, to the levying officer within 15 days from the date of service. If the earnings withholding order is ineffective, the employer shall state in the employer’s return that the order will not be complied with for this reason and shall return the order to the levying officer with the employer’s return.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 64, Sec. 6.   (SB 233)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

706.105.

(a) A judgment debtor may claim an exemption under Section 706.051 under either of the following circumstances:

(1) No prior hearing has been held with respect to the earnings withholding order.

(2) There has been a material change in circumstances since the time of the last prior hearing on the earnings withholding order.

(b) A claim of exemption shall be made by filing with the levying officer an original and one copy of (1) the judgment debtor’s claim of exemption and (2) the judgment debtor’s financial statement.

(c) Upon filing of the claim of exemption, the levying
 officer shall promptly send to the judgment creditor, at the address stated in the application for the earnings withholding order, by first-class mail, postage prepaid, all of the following:

(1) A copy of the claim of exemption.

(2) A copy of the financial statement.

(3) A notice of claim of exemption. The notice shall state that the claim of exemption has been filed and that the earnings withholding order will be terminated, or modified to reflect the amount of earnings claimed to be exempt in the claim of exemption, unless a notice of opposition to the claim of exemption is filed with the levying officer by the judgment creditor within 10 days after the date of the mailing of the notice of claim of exemption.

(d) A judgment creditor who desires to
 contest a claim of exemption shall, within 10 days after the date of the mailing of the notice of claim of exemption, file with the levying officer a notice of opposition to the claim of exemption.

(e) (1) If a notice of opposition to the claim of exemption is filed with the levying officer within the 10-day period, the judgment creditor is entitled to a hearing on the claim of exemption. If the judgment creditor desires a hearing on the claim of exemption, the judgment creditor shall file a notice of motion for an order determining the claim of exemption with the court within 10 days after the date the levying officer mailed the notice of claim of exemption. If the notice of motion is so filed, the hearing on the motion shall be held not later than 30 days from the date the notice of motion was filed unless continued by the court for good cause. Where the judgment upon which the writ is issued is for personal debt, as
 defined in subdivision (d) of Section 683.110, if the hearing is delayed by the court and cannot be set within 30 days of notice of the motion, a party may seek by ex parte application, and the court shall issue, an order staying any levy or garnishment with respect to the property subject to the claim of exemption until the hearing occurs. At the time prescribed by subdivision (b) of Section 1005, the judgment creditor shall give written notice of the hearing to the levying officer and shall serve a notice of the hearing and a copy of the notice of opposition to the claim of exemption on the judgment debtor and, if the claim of exemption so requested, on the attorney for the judgment debtor. Service is deemed made when the notice of the hearing and a copy of the notice of opposition to the claim of exemption are deposited in the mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the judgment debtor at the address stated in the claim of exemption and, if service on the attorney for the judgment debtor was requested in the
 claim of exemption, to the attorney at the address stated in the claim of exemption. The judgment creditor shall file proof of the service with the court. After receiving the notice of the hearing and before the date set for the hearing, the levying officer shall file the claim of exemption and the notice of opposition to the claim of exemption with the court.

(2) The filing of an ex parte application under this section is not a general appearance and shall not constitute a waiver of the right to bring a motion under Section 418.10.

(f) If the levying officer does not receive a notice of opposition to the claim of exemption within the 10-day period after the date of mailing of the notice of claim of exemption and a notice of the hearing not later than 10 days after the filing of the notice of opposition to the claim of exemption, the levying officer shall serve on the employer one
 of the following:

(1) A notice that the earnings withholding order has been terminated if all of the judgment debtor’s earnings were claimed to be exempt.

(2) A modified earnings withholding order that reflects the amount of earnings claimed to be exempt in the claim of exemption if only a portion of the judgment debtor’s earnings was claimed to be exempt.

(g) If, after hearing, the court orders that the earnings withholding order be modified or terminated, the clerk shall promptly transmit a certified copy of the order to the levying officer who shall promptly serve on the employer of the judgment debtor (1) a copy of the modified earnings withholding order or (2) a notice that the earnings withholding order has been terminated.

(1) Where the judgment
 debtor’s wages are exempt without making a claim, the court shall terminate or modify the earnings withholding order, and shall order the return by a date certain of all of the judgment debtor’s exempt wages. Where the judgment upon which the writ is issued is for personal debt, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 683.110, the court shall order the return by a date certain of any wages that were exempt without the need for a claim and that were garnished for up to 12 months preceding the date of the order on the claim of exemption. This paragraph does not limit a judge’s authority to order, for good cause, the return of any exempt property taken more than 12 months preceding the date of the order on the claim of exemption.

(2) Where the judgment debtor’s wages are exempt as the result of a claim of exemption, the court shall terminate or modify the earnings withholding order, and shall order the return by a date certain of all of the
 judgment debtor’s exempt wages. Where the judgment upon which the writ is issued is for personal debt, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 683.110, the court shall order the return by a date certain any wages that the debtor has demonstrated would have been exempt by claim of exemption and that were garnished for up to six months preceding the date of the order on the claim of exemption. This paragraph does not limit a judge’s authority to order, for good cause, the return of any exempt property taken more than six months preceding the date of the order on the claim of exemption.

(3) If the court determines that any amount withheld pursuant to the earnings withholding order should be paid to the judgment debtor, the court shall order the levying officer, judgment creditor, or other person, who is in possession of the property, to return the exempt property to the judgment debtor. A levying officer shall return the exempt property within 20
 business days of receipt of notice of the order. A judgment creditor shall return the exempt property within 10 business days of entry of the order.

(h) If the earnings withholding order is terminated by the court, unless the court otherwise orders or unless there is a material change of circumstances since the time of the last prior hearing on the earnings withholding order, the judgment creditor may not apply for another earnings withholding order directed to the same employer with respect to the same judgment debtor for a period of 100 days following the date of service of the earnings withholding order or 60 days after the date of the termination of the order, whichever is later. Where the judgment upon which the writ is issued is for personal debt, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 683.110, the judgment creditor may not apply for another earnings withholding order directed to the same employer with respect to the same judgment
 debtor for a period of 100 days following the date of service of the earnings withholding order or 60 days after the date of the termination of the order, whichever is later.

(i) If an employer has withheld and paid over amounts pursuant to an earnings withholding order after the date of termination of the order but prior to the receipt of notice of its termination, the judgment debtor may recover those amounts only from the levying officer if the levying officer still holds those amounts or, if those amounts have been paid over to the judgment creditor, from the judgment creditor. If the employer has withheld amounts pursuant to an earnings withholding order after termination of the order but has not paid over those amounts to the levying officer, the employer shall pay those amounts to the judgment debtor within five business days of the end of the next pay period.

(j) An appeal